Utah statutes.
67-5a-1.   Utah Prosecution Council -- Duties -- Membership.
(1)  There is created within the Office of the Attorney General the Utah
Prosecution Council, referred to as the council in this chapter.
(2)  The council shall:
(a)  provide training and continuing legal education for state and local
prosecutors;
(b)  provide assistance to local prosecutors; and
(c)  as funds are available and as are budgeted for this purpose, provide
reimbursement for unusual expenses related to prosecution for violations of
state laws.
(3)  The council shall be composed of ten members, selected as follows:
(a)  the attorney general or a designated representative;
(b)  the commissioner of public safety or a designated representative;
(c)  four currently serving county or district attorneys designated by the
county or district attorneys' section of the Utah Association of Counties; a
county or district attorney's term expires when a successor is designated by
the county or district attorneys' section or when he is no longer serving as a
county attorney or district attorney, whichever occurs first;
(d)  two city prosecutors designated by the Utah Municipal Attorneys
Association; a city prosecutor's term expires when a successor is designated
by the association or when he is no longer employed as a city prosecutor,
whichever occurs first;
(e)  the chair of the Board of Directors of the Statewide Association of
Public Attorneys of Utah; and
(f)  the chair of the governing board of the Utah Prosecutorial Assistants
Association.
